Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska35-1316
Annual account; appropriations and contributions; liability; limitation.

(1) Each city, village, or rural or suburban fire protection district conducting a service award benefit program shall appropriate for the annual account for each year of service in which such program is in existence a sum to be determined by the governing body as sufficient to meet the purposes of the program.

(2) The total amount of all contributions from all sources made to any annual account shall not exceed three thousand dollars times the number of participants listed on the certification list for the year of service covered by that annual account. The service award benefit paid to a qualifying participant or beneficiary shall not include in any participant's share of an annual account any contributions made to the annual account for that year of service which are allocable to the participant or beneficiary in excess of the sum of three thousand dollars and any income derived from the investment of those excess sums.

(3) No city, village, or rural or suburban fire protection district conducting a service award benefit program shall incur any obligation or liability with regard to contributions into any annual account under such program beyond the amount of contributions actually appropriated by such local political subdivision for such purpose and actually distributed into such accounts.

Laws 1999, LB 849, § 16;

Laws 2001, LB 808, § 13.